Massachusetts, session 194th, H3156.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding clause forty-first A of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws or
any general or special law to the contrary, the town of Ipswich may, by vote of its select board,
may adjust the gross receipts limit for Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 59, Section 5,
Clause 41A, by increasing the allowable income for applicants to match the limits that apply
under subsection (k) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, and for adjustment to be
effective for exemptions granted for any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
of 1